Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1173.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1371.1 of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
As used in this act:

Req. No. 12151 Page 1

1. "Board" means, unless otherwise explicitly stated, the State
Board of Examiners of Psychologists;
2. "Conditional prescription certificate" means a document
issued by the State Board of Examiners of Psychologists to a
licensed psychologist who has met requirements for said certificate
that permits the holder to prescribe psychotropic medication under
the supervision of a supervising physician;
3. "Prescription certificate" means a document issued by the
State Board of Examiners of Psychologists to a licensed psychologist
that permits the holder to prescribe psychotropic medication after
met requirements;
4. "Psychologist" has the same meaning as provided in Section
1352 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
5. "Psychotropic medication" means a controlled substance or
drug that may not be dispensed or administered without a
prescription and whose primary use has been approved by the federal
Food and Drug Administration for the treatment of mental disorders
or is listed as a psychotherapeutic agent in Drug Facts and
Comparisons 2017, or the most recent edition of that book, or in
American Hospital Formulary Service Drug Information, and includes
antidepressants, antianxiety medications, stimulants,
antipsychotics, and mood stabilizers; and


Req. No. 12151 Page 2

6. "Supervising physician" means a licensed allopathic
physician or osteopathic physician who is supervising a psychologist
in the prescribing of psychotropic medication.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1371.2 of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A licensed psychologist holding a conditional prescription
certificate may prescribe psychotropic medication under the
supervision of a supervising physician.
B. A licensed psychologist holding a prescription certificate
may prescribe psychotropic medication independent of the supervision
of a supervising physician.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1371.3 of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A psychologist may apply to the State Board of Examiners of
Psychologists for a conditional prescription certificate. The
application shall be made on a form approved by the Board and be
accompanied by evidence satisfactory to the Board that the
applicant:
1. Has completed a doctoral program in psychology from an
accredited institution of higher education or professional school,
or, if the program was not accredited at the time of the applicant's

Req. No. 12151 Page 3

grad uation, that the program meets professional standards determined
acceptable by the Board;
2. Holds a current license to practice psychology in this
state;
3. Has successfully completed a postdoctoral master of science
degree in psychopharmacology from an institution of higher education
approved by the State Board of Examiners of Psychologists, the State
Board of Medical Licensure and Supervision, and the State Board of
Osteopathic Examiners;
4. Has passed a national certification examination approved by
the State Board of Examiners of Psychologists, the State Board of
Medical Licensure and Supervision, and the State Board of
Osteopathic Examiners that tests the applicant's knowledge of
pharmacology in the diagnosis, care, and treatment of mental
disorders;
5. Within the five (5) years immediately preceding the date of
application, has successfully completed an organized program of
education approved by the State Board of Examiners of Psychologists,
the State Board of Medical Licensure and Supervision, and the State
Board of Osteopathic Examiners which included didactic instruction
of no fewer than four hundred fifty (450) classroom hours in at
least the following core areas of instruction:
a. neuroscience,
b. pharmacology,
Req. No. 12151 Page 4

c. psychopharmacology,
d. physiology,
e. pathophysiology,
f. appropriate and relevant physical and laboratory
assessment, and
g. clinical pharmacotherapeutics; or
6. Within the five (5) years immediately preceding the date of
application, has been certified by each of the applicant's
supervising physicians as having successfully completed a supervised
and relevant clinical experience, approved by the State Board of
Examiners of Psychologists, the State Board of Medical Licensure and
Supervision, and the State Board of Osteopathic Examiners, of:
a. no less than an eighty-hour practicum in clinical
assessment and pathophysiology under the supervision
of a licensed allopathic or osteopathic physician, and
b. an additional supervised practicum of at least four
hundred (400) hours treating no fewer than one hundred
patients with mental disorders. The practicum to have
been supervised one-to-one by any one or a combination
of a psychiatrist or other appropriately trained
licensed allopathic or osteopathic physician and
determined by the State Board of Examiners of
Psychologists, the State Board of Medical Licensure
and Supervision, and the State Board of Osteopathic
Req. No. 12151 Page 5

Examiners to be sufficient to competently train the
applicant in the treatment of a diverse patient
population. One-to-one supervision shall be provided
either face-to-face, telephonically, or by
videoconference.
B. The State Board of Examiners of Psychologists shall issue a
conditional prescription certificate if it finds that the applicant
has met the requirements of subsection A of this section. The
certificate shall be valid for a period of two (2) years, at the end
of which the holder may again apply pursuant to the provisions of
subsection A of this section.
C. A psychologist with a conditional prescription certificate
may prescribe psychotropic medication under the supervision of a
supervising physician subject to the following conditions:
1. The psychologist shall continue to hold a current license to
practice psychology in this state and shall maintain malpractice
insurance in accordance with rules prescribed by the Board;
2. The psychologist shall notify the Board of the name of the
psychologist's supervising physician; and
3. A supervising physician shall notify the supervising
physician's own licensing board of the name of each psychologist
under the supervising physician's supervision.
D. A supervising physician shall not be liable for the acts of
a psychologist under the supervising physician's supervision unless
Req. No. 12151 Page 6

an i njury or loss arises from those acts under the direction and
control of the supervising physician.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-12151 TKR 01/07/25



















Req. No. 12151 Page 7